Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
636

JUDGMENT

Section

636-1, 2 Repealed

636-3 Judgment, orders, decrees; lien when

636-4 Examination of judgment debtors and others

636-5 Action on judgment; penalty for failure to
credit

payments

636-11 to 14 Repealed

636-15 Default judgments

636-16 Awarding interest

Note

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of court,
see note preceding Title 32.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next